Utah statutes.
54-4-13.1.   Natural gas vehicle rate.

(1)  The commission may find that a gas corporation's request for a natural gas vehicle rate that is less than full cost of service is:

(a)  in the public interest; and

(b)  just and reasonable.

(2)  If the commission approves a gas corporation's request under Subsection (1), the remaining costs may be spread to other customers of the gas corporation.

